Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-103
County veterans service committee; members; removal from office; filling of vacancy.

The county board may at any time remove any member of the county veterans service committee for neglect of duty, maladministration, or upon recommendation of all recognized veterans organizations in the county and appoint another veteran in the place of the member thus removed; Provided, that such appointment shall be made in accordance with the provisions of section 80-101.

Laws 1889, c. 72, § 4, p. 530;

R.S.1913, § 7157;

C.S.1922, § 6803;

C.S.1929, § 80-106;

R.S.1943, § 80-103;

Laws 1953, c. 324, § 3, p. 1072;

Laws 1969, c. 752, § 3, p. 2832.